Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-510
Termination of act; conditions; preemption of local law.

(1) The Reduced Cigarette Ignition Propensity Act shall terminate if a federal reduced cigarette ignition propensity standard that preempts the act is adopted and becomes effective.

(2) The Reduced Cigarette Ignition Propensity Act preempts any local law on the subject and no political subdivision shall enact or enforce any ordinance or other local law or regulation conflicting with any provision of the act or with any policy of this state expressed by the act, whether the policy is expressed by inclusion of a provision in the act or by exclusion of that subject from the act.

Laws 2009, LB198, § 10.